Utah statutes.
64-9b-1.   Legislative findings.

(1)  The Legislature finds that it is in the best interest of the state for the department to:

(a)  develop job opportunities to further enhance the rehabilitation of inmates of the Utah state prison;

(b)  establish and actively work toward the goal that all inmates shall be productively involved in a treatment, education, or work program, or a combination of these programs, as appropriate, except for inmates who the department determines have a physical or mental disability, or pose a danger to the public, so that they are unable to engage in these activities; and

(c)  submit a comprehensive management plan outlining the department's plan to meet this goal to the Legislature on or before November 1 of each even-numbered year, and the plan shall include:

(i)  a cost-effective analysis of current inmate education, treatment, and work programs; and

(ii)  a study of the feasibility of expanding inmate work programs, particularly in regard to programs that:

(A)  are not capital intensive;

(B)  do not unfairly compete with existing Utah industry; and

(C)  are designed to increase the motivation, develop the work capabilities, and foster the cooperation of inmates.

(2)  The Legislature further finds that a proper means to accomplish this is through a liberal application of this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 366, 2011 General Session

